test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_olmoos_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - olmooš: # ok, MLO

    olmoos+N+Sg+Nom:  olmooš
    olmoos+N+Sg+Gen:  ulmuu
    olmoos+N+Sg+Acc:  ulmuu
    olmoos+N+Sg+Ill:  ulmui
    olmoos+N+Sg+Loc:  ulmust
    olmoos+N+Sg+Com: ulmuin
    olmoos+N+Sg+Abe:  ulmuuttáá
    olmoos+N+Ess: oˊlmožin
    olmoos+N+Par: oˊlmožid
    olmoos+N+Pl+Nom:  ulmuuh
    olmoos+N+Pl+Gen:  ulmui
    olmoos+N+Pl+Acc:  ulmuid
    olmoos+N+Pl+Ill:  ulmuid
    olmoos+N+Pl+Loc:  ulmuin
    olmoos+N+Pl+Com:  ulmuiguin
    olmoos+N+Pl+Abe:  ulmuittáá
